Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-413
Distribution to
another registrant; manner.

Controlled
substances listed in
Schedules I and II of section 28-405 shall be distributed by a registrant
to another registrant pursuant
to an order form or the electronic
controlled substance ordering system of the administration.

Compliance
with the provisions of the Controlled Substances Act, 21 U.S.C. 801 et seq.,
as such act existed on January
1, 2014, respecting order forms shall be deemed compliance with
this section.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 73;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 11;

Laws 2014, LB811, § 5.